Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.285

Director's approval of a branch—Satisfactory financial condition—Affiliated commercial locations.

(1) The director's approval of a branch within the United States or any territory of the United States or in any foreign country shall be conditioned on a finding by the director that the bank has a satisfactory record of compliance with applicable laws and has a satisfactory financial condition. A bank chartered under this title may exercise any powers and authorities at any branch outside Washington that are permissible for a bank operating in that state where the branch is located, except to the extent those activities are expressly prohibited by the laws of this state or by any rule or order of the director applicable to the state bank. However, the director may waive any limitation in writing with respect to powers and authorities that the director determines do not threaten the safety or soundness of the state bank.

(2) An out-of-state bank may acquire, establish, or maintain a branch in Washington within one mile of an affiliate commercial location only to the same extent permitted for a Washington bank under applicable state and federal law. For purposes of this subsection, "bank" means any national bank, state bank, and district bank, as defined in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813(a); "out-of-state bank" means a bank whose home state is a state other than Washington; and "Washington bank" means a bank whose home state is Washington. "Home state" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 30A.38.005.

[ 2014 c 37 s 128; 2007 c 167 s 1; 1996 c 2 s 6. Formerly RCW 30.04.285.]